Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-295
Act, how construed.

The Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act shall be so applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 63;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 62.